New Jersey, session 221, S2998.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section: "Activity of daily living" means a function or task that is completed for self-care. Activity of daily living includes, but is not limited to:  dressing, bathing, toilet use, transfer, locomotion, bed mobility, and eating. "Adult medical day care" means a community-based group program designed to meet the needs of functionally or cognitively impaired adults through an individual plan of care structured to provide a variety of health, social, and related support services in a protective setting during any part of a day but less than 24 hours. b.  A Medicaid enrollee shall be deemed eligible to receive adult medical day care services if the individual: (1) requires assistance or supervision with an activity of daily living; (2) possesses a letter or prescription from a physician recommending adult medical day care services; and (3) furnishes an up-to-date copy of the individuals medical history and a current report of a physical examination of the individual completed by a physician. 2.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall apply for such State plan amendments or waivers as shall be necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 3.  The Commissioner of Human Services may adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 4.  This act shall take effect immediately.